North Carolina statutes. Chapter 42A. Vacation Rental Act.
Article 6. General Provisions.

§ 42A-36.
Mandatory evacuations.

If State or local authorities, acting pursuant to Article 1A of Chapter 166A of the General Statutes, order a mandatory evacuation of an area that includes the residential property subject to a vacation rental, the tenant under the vacation rental agreement, whether in possession of the property or not, shall comply with the evacuation order. Upon compliance, the tenant shall be entitled to a refund from the landlord of the rent, taxes, and any other payments made by the tenant pursuant to the vacation rental agreement as a condition of the tenant’s right to occupy the property prorated for each night that the tenant is unable to occupy the property because of the mandatory evacuation order. The tenant shall not be entitled to a refund if: (i) prior to the tenant taking possession of the property, the tenant refused insurance offered by the landlord or real estate broker that would have compensated the tenant for losses or damages resulting from loss of use of the property due to a mandatory evacuation order; or (ii) the tenant purchased insurance offered by the landlord or real estate broker. The insurance offered shall be provided by an insurance company duly authorized by the North Carolina Department of Insurance, and the cost of the insurance shall not exceed eight percent (8%) of the total amount charged for the vacation rental to the tenant less the amount paid by the tenant for a security deposit.

History.

1999-420, s. 1; 2005-292, s. 3; 2009-245, s. 2; 2012-12, s. 2(h).

Cross References.

As to emergency management efforts, generally, see

G.S. 166A-19

et seq.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-245, s. 2, effective June 30, 2009, in the second sentence, substituted “rent, taxes, and any other payments made by the tenant pursuant to the vacation rental agreement as a condition of the tenant’s right to occupy the property prorated” for “prorated rent” and in the last sentence, substituted “total amount” for “total rent,” and added “less the amount paid by the tenant for a security deposit” at the end.

Session Laws 2012-12, s. 2(h), effective October 1, 2012, substituted “Article 1A of Chapter 166A” for “Article 36A of Chapter 14 or Article 1 of Chapter 166A.”

§ 42A-37.
Early termination of vacation rental agreement by military personnel.

Any member of the Armed Forces of the United States who executes a vacation rental agreement and subsequently receives (i) an order for deployment with a military unit for a period overlapping with the rental period or (ii) permanent change of station orders requiring the member to relocate on a date prior to the beginning of the lease term may terminate the member’s vacation rental agreement by providing the landlord or landlord’s agent with a written notice of termination within 10 calendar days of receipt of the order. The notice must be accompanied by either a copy of the official military orders or a written verification signed by the member’s commanding officer. Termination of a lease pursuant to this subsection is effective immediately upon receipt of the notice by the landlord or landlord’s agent. All monies paid by the terminating member, with the exception of nonrefundable fees paid to third parties as described in

G.S. 42-16

, in connection with the vacation rental agreement shall be refunded to the member within 30 days of termination of the agreement.

A member’s termination of a vacation rental agreement pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall also terminate any obligation a spouse or dependent of the member may have under the vacation rental agreement.

The right to terminate a vacation rental agreement as described in subsection (a) of this section shall extend to the spouse of any member of the Armed Forces of the United States. A spouse exercising the right to terminate a rental agreement shall provide the same notice as described in subsection (a) of this section.

The provisions of this section may not be waived or modified by the agreement of the parties.

History.

2016-98, s. 1.4; 2017-212, s. 8.6.

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 2016-98, s. 1.9, made this section effective July 1, 2016, and further provides that “Nothing in this Part [Part I of Session Laws 2016-98] shall be construed as being applicable to or affecting any litigation pending on that date.”

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2017-212, s. 8.6, effective October 8, 2017, substituted “G.S. 42A-16” for “G.S. 42A-16(a)” in the fourth sentence of subsection (a).

§§ 42A-38 through 42A-40.

Reserved for future codification purposes.